Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-236
Service on corporation.

(MBCA 5.04) (a) A corporation's
registered agent is the corporation's agent for service of process, notice,
or demand required or permitted by law to be served on the corporation.

(b) If a corporation has
no registered agent, or the agent cannot with reasonable diligence be served,
the corporation may be served by registered or certified mail, return receipt
requested, addressed to the secretary of the corporation at its principal
office. Service is perfected under this subsection at the earliest of:

(1) The date the corporation
receives the mail;

(2)
The date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the corporation;
or

(3)
Five days after its deposit in the United States mail, as evidenced by the
postmark, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed.

(c) This section does not prescribe
the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a corporation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 36.
January 1, 2016